District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-937

Penalties — Unauthorized use of term “cooperative”; existing cooperatives.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 489, ch. 397, § 37
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 909, ch. 646, § 1
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 488(b), 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, §§ 2(s)(2), 26(b), 38 DCR 314
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-217, § 2(b), 46 DCR 284
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-937.
1981 Ed., § 29-1137.
1973 Ed., § 29-837.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Cooperative Association Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-265, April 25, 1997, law notification 43 DCR 4355).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Cooperative Association Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-483, January 13, 1997, 44 DCR 626), § 2(b) of the Cooperative Association Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-59, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2235), and § 2(b) of the Cooperative Association Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-203, December 2, 1997, 44 DCR 7498).